Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.420

Transfer to another county. (Effective until June 1, 2025.)

A registered voter who changes his or her residence from one county to another county must do so by submitting a voter registration form or by submitting information to the department of licensing, the health benefit exchange, or an agency designated under RCW 29A.08.365 once automatic voter registration is implemented at the agency. The county auditor of the voter's new county shall transfer the voter's registration from the county of the previous registration.

[ 2018 c 110 s 205; 2009 c 369 s 23; 2004 c 267 s 122; 2003 c 111 s 229; 1999 c 100 s 3; 1994 c 57 s 36; 1991 c 81 s 24; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 26; 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 26; 1965 c 9 s 29.10.040. Prior: 1933 c 1 s 15; RRS s 5114-15. Formerly RCW 29.10.040.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—Intent—2018 c 110: See notes following RCW 29A.08.355.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Severability—1994 c 57: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.